Illinois, session 104th, HB1848.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-40 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 430/5-40)7    Sec. 5-40. Fundraising during session. Except as provided 8in this Section, any executive branch constitutional officer, 9any candidate for an executive branch constitutional office, 10any member of the General Assembly, any candidate for the 11General Assembly, any political caucus of the General 12Assembly, or any political committee on behalf of any of the 13foregoing may not hold a political fundraising function on any 14day the legislature is in session or the day immediately prior 15to such day. This Section does not apply to a political 16fundraising function scheduled at least 14 days in advance of 17a day the legislature is in special session or the day 18immediately prior to such day. For purposes of this Section, 19the legislature is not considered to be in session on a day 20that is solely a perfunctory session day or on a day when only 21a committee is meeting. 22(Source: P.A. 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.)